Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
853

CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE: DEFERRED ACCEPTANCE OF GUILTY

PLEA, NOLO
CONTENDERE PLEA

Section

853-1 Deferred acceptance of guilty plea or nolo
contendere

plea; discharge and dismissal, expungement
of records

853-2 Plea of guilty or nolo contendere;
procedure

853-3 Violation of terms and conditions during
deferment;

result

853-4 Chapter not applicable; when

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1983, c 290, §1.

Case Notes

A conditional plea under HRPP rule 11(a)(2) is inconsistent
with the granting of a deferred acceptance of guilty plea pursuant to this
chapter; defendant's appeal from trial court's order granting motion for
deferred plea did not provide a jurisdictional basis for review of an adverse
pretrial suppression order purportedly preserved by the trial court's allowance
of defendant's conditional plea. 95 H. 309, 22 P.3d 588 (2001).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next